testing/kom-tests.yaml
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: нёльясӧйланьсянь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: нёльясланьӧдым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: нёльясланьтіым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: нёльясланьӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльясыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльястӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльяснад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльястӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльясыдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: нёльяссяыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльясад
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльясланьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльяссяньыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: нёльястіыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: нёльясланяд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: нёльясланьсьыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: нёльясланяд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: нёльясланьсяньыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: нёльясланьӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: нёльясланьтіыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: нёльясланьӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльясыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльясыслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльяснас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльястӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльясысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: нёльяссяыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльясас
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльясланьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльяссяньыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: нёльястіыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: нёльясланяс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: нёльясланьсьыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: нёльясланяс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: нёльясланьсяньыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: нёльясланьӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: нёльясланьтіыс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: нёльясланьӧдзыc
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нёльясным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: нёльяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: нёльяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: нёльяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: нёльяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: нёльяснаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: нёльяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: нёльястӧгным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: нёльяснымла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: нёльяссяным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльясаным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: нёльясланьным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: нёльяссяньным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: нёльястіным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: нёльясланяным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: нёльясланьсьыным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: нёльясланяным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: нёльясланьсяньным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: нёльясланьӧдным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: нёльясланьтіным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: нёльясланьӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нёльясныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: нёльясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: нёльясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: нёльясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: нёльясныдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: нёльяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: нёльясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльястӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльясныдла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: нёльяссяныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльясаныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльяссяньныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльястіныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: нёльясланяныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: нёльясланьсьыныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: нёльясланяныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: нёльясланьсяньныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: нёльясланьӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: нёльясланьтіныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: нёльясланьӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльясныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльясныслы
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльястӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльяснысла
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: нёльяссяныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльясаныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльясныслань
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльясланьныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльяссяньныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльястіныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: нёльясланяныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: нёльясланьсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: нёльясланяныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: нёльясланьсяньныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: нёльясланьӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: нёльясланьтіныс
     нёль+Num+Card+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: нёльясланьӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Abs: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёльӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёльӧд, нёльӧдӧс]
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльӧдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльӧдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльӧдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльӧдӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёльӧдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльӧдтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльӧдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp: нёльӧдся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльӧдын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльӧдысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльӧдӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльӧдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльӧдсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльӧдӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra: нёльӧдті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльӧдӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ine: нёльӧдланьын
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ela: нёльӧдланьысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ill: нёльӧдланьӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Egr: нёльӧдланьсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Prl: нёльӧдланьӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Tra: нёльӧдланьті
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ter: нёльӧдланьӧдз
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нёльӧдӧй
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: нёльӧдӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: нёльӧдӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: нёльӧдӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: нёльӧдӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: нёльӧднам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: нёльӧдӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: нёльӧдӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: нёльӧдӧйла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Comp: нёльӧдӧйся
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёльӧдам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльӧдсьым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёльӧдам
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: нёльӧдӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: нёльӧдӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдӧдым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: нёльӧдтіым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: нёльӧдланям
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: нёльӧдланьсьым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: нёльӧдланям
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: нёльӧдӧйланьсянь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: нёльӧдланьӧдым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: нёльӧдланьтіым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: нёльӧдланьӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльӧдыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльӧдыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльӧдыдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльӧдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльӧднад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльӧдыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльӧдтӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльӧдыдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: нёльӧдсяыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдсьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдад
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдсяньыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: нёльӧдтіыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: нёльӧдланяд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьсьыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: нёльӧдланяд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьсяньыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьтіыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: нёльӧдланьӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльӧдыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльӧдыслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльӧдыслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльӧдсӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльӧднас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльӧдыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльӧдтӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльӧдысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: нёльӧдсяыс
